Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5733
Rules and regulations.

The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate all rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Advantage Act.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 55.